Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXII Ownership and Conveyance of Property
CHAPTER 382 Conveyances and Encumbrances
382.385.
Mortgage on real estate to secure payment of sums due under line of credit or revolving credit plan — Priority of liens — Mortgage amendment — Release of lien.

As used in this section:

“Line of credit” means a note, commitment, instrument, or agreement in writing between a lender and a debtor pursuant to which:

The lender may extend loans, advances, or other extensions of credit to, or for the benefit of, the debtor; and

The total amount of loans, advances, or extensions of credit outstanding may increase or decrease from time to time.

“Revolving credit plan” means an arrangement between a lender and a debtor pursuant to which:

The lender may extend credit to the debtor by permitting the debtor to make purchases of goods, services, and anything else of value or obtain loans, from time to time, directly from the lender or indirectly by use of a credit card, check, or other device, as the plan may provide;

The unpaid balances of purchases made, the principal of loans obtained, and finance and other appropriate charges are debited to the debtor’s account;

A finance charge, if made, is not precomputed, but is computed on the outstanding unpaid balances of the debtor’s account from time to time; and

The lender renders bills or statements to the debtor at regular intervals, which need not be a calendar month (the “billing cycle”), the amount of which bills or statements is payable by and due from the debtor on a specified date stated in the bill or statement or, at the debtor’s option, may be paid in installments.

Any mortgage of real property may secure payment of any or all sums due and payable by the debtor under a line of credit or under a revolving credit plan if the mortgage:

States, in substance or effect, that the parties intend that the mortgage secures the line of credit or revolving credit plan;

Specifies the maximum principal amount of credit which may be extended under the line of credit or the maximum credit limit of the revolving credit plan which, in each case, may be outstanding at any time or times under the line of credit or plan, and which is to be secured by the mortgage.

The mortgage shall remain in full force and effect until released of record as provided in subsection (5) of this section and the validity, continued effectiveness, and priority of the mortgage shall not be affected or impaired by the fact that no loan, advance, or extension of credit is made at the time of the execution or recordation of the mortgage, or that the outstanding balance due under the line of credit or revolving credit plan secured by the mortgage is zero at any time or times.

Except as provided in paragraphs (a), (b), (c), and (d) of this subsection or in any written subordination or other written agreement entered into by the lender relating to the priority of the mortgage referred to in subsection (2) of this section, the lien of the mortgage referred to in subsection (2) of this section shall be superior to any liens or encumbrances of any kind created or arising after recordation of the mortgage, even to the extent of sums advanced by the lender with actual or constructive notice of a subsequently created lien, but the lien of the mortgage shall be inferior to:

Real estate tax liens and liens for public improvement assessments explicitly stated by statute to be superior to other nontax liens;

Any construction funds advanced under, or any additional indebtedness incurred within the meaning of KRS

382.520

and secured by, the lien of any mortgage recorded prior to the mortgage referred to in subsection (2) of this section;

Any sums specifically authorized to be advanced under any mortgage recorded prior to the mortgage referred to in subsection (2) of this section for, or paid on account of, taxes, charges, fines, and assessments against covering the property described in the mortgage or to effect insurance thereon; or

Valid mechanics’ or materialmen’s liens, with respect to which all filing and other requirements of KRS Chapter 376 have been satisfied, for the performance of labor or furnishing of materials for those purposes set forth in KRS 376.010(1) with respect to an owner-occupied, single or double-family dwelling, but only to the extent of sums advanced by the lender after the filing of the statement required under the applicable section of KRS Chapter 376.

The debtor or his agent may, at any time or times, request the lender to amend the mortgage to reduce the maximum amount of credit specified in the mortgage referred to in subsection (2) of this section which may be extended under the line of credit or revolving credit plan by sending by certified mail, return receipt requested, or physically delivering to the lender at the address and to the person or department, if any, specified in the agreement establishing the line of credit or revolving credit plan, a written request signed and acknowledged by all debtors obligated under the line of credit or revolving credit plan. The request shall:

Specifically, and not by implication, describe the line of credit or revolving credit plan by account or other identifying number and request that the line of credit or plan be amended by reducing the maximum amount of credit which may be extended under the line of credit or the amount of the credit limit of the revolving credit plan which, in either case, may be outstanding from time to time under the line of credit or revolving credit plan, to an amount specified in the notice. The amount may not, however, be less than the balance owing under the line of credit or revolving credit plan at the time the request referred to in this paragraph is received;

Identify the real property covered by the mortgage referred to in subsection (2) of this section to which the request relates and give the date, volume, and first page of the records of the county clerk where the mortgage is recorded, which information shall be provided to the debtor within sixty (60) days of recording by the lender; and

Be accompanied by funds sufficient to pay the filing fee for recording the amendment referred to in paragraph (b) of this subsection.

Within ten (10) business days after actual receipt of the request referred to in paragraph (a) of this subsection and of the funds sufficient to pay the filing fee, the lender shall record in the office of the county clerk in which the mortgage referred to in subsection (2) of this section is recorded an amendment to the mortgage reflecting the reduction in the maximum amount of credit at any time or times outstanding which may be extended under the line of credit or revolving credit plan secured by the mortgage.

If within the ten (10) day period the lender fails to record the amendment to the mortgage referred to in paragraph (b) of this subsection, the debtor may record a copy of the written request referred to in paragraph (a) of this subsection upon payment of the same filing fee as provided for in an amendment to a mortgage. If the request complies with all the requirements of this section, the recording of the request shall constitute and be deemed to be an amendment to the line of credit or revolving credit plan and the mortgage to the extent described in the request.

The lender shall be obligated to release the lien of the mortgage referred to in subsection (2) of this section:

If the line of credit or revolving credit plan is closed or terminated in accordance with its terms and all amounts owed by the debtor thereunder are paid in full; or

Upon the written request to release the mortgage signed by all debtors or their agents obligated under the line of credit or revolving credit plan, which notice shall be sent by certified mail, return receipt requested, or physically delivered to the lender. The lender shall file a properly executed satisfaction of the mortgage upon payment of the balance owing under the line of credit or revolving credit plan at the time the request is received. From and after the request, the debtor shall have no right to request or demand that the lender extend credit under the line of credit or revolving credit plan, and the lender shall be released from all obligations and commitments to extend credit thereunder.

The provisions of KRS

382.330

,

382.365

,

382.430

, and

382.520

shall not be applicable to the mortgage referred to in subsection (2) of this section.

This section is not exclusive and shall not prohibit the use of other types of mortgages or other instruments given for the purpose of creating a lien on real property permitted by law.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 49, § 1, effective July 14, 1992.

Research References and Practice Aids

Northern Kentucky Law Review.

Brandt, Kentucky Real Estate Law Survey: 1990 Through 1993, 21 N. Ky. L. Rev. 435 (1994).

382.390.
Rolling stock of railroads; conditional sale or lien to be recorded. [Repealed.]

382.400.
Contract may provide for conditional sale. [Repealed.]

382.410.
Recording of payment of purchase money. [Repealed.]

382.420.
Ownership to be shown on engine and cars. [Repealed.]

382.430.
Instrument constituting lien to give mailing address of lienholder.

No mortgage, conveyance, or other instrument or writing constituting a lien or other security for any note or other evidence of indebtedness shall be received for record by any county clerk unless such mortgage, conveyance, or other writing gives a mailing address of the lienholder.

Should there be an assignment of such mortgage, conveyance, or other instrument or writing constituting a lien or other security for any note or other evidence of indebtedness, of record in the clerk’s office, the assignment shall state the address of the assignee.

For the purposes of this chapter, a mortgage that has been recorded with any county clerk shall not be deemed invalid or ineffective as constructive notice for failure to include the county of residence or the principal place of business of the mortgagee or holder of the note or other evidence of indebtedness.

History.

4051a; 2010, ch. 155, § 3, effective July 15, 2010; 2012, ch. 132, § 100, effective July 12, 2012.

382.440.
Memorandum of actions affecting real property to be filed.

No action, cross-action, counterclaim, or any other proceeding, except actions for forcible detainer or forcible entry or detainer, commenced or filed in any court of this state, in which the title to, or the possession or use of, or any lien, tax, assessment or charge on real property, or any interest therein, is in any manner affected or involved, nor any order nor judgment therein, nor any sale or other proceeding, nor any proceeding in, nor judgment or decree rendered, in a district court of the United States, shall in any manner affect the right, title or interest of any subsequent purchaser, lessee, or encumbrancer of such real property, or interest for value and without notice thereof, except from the time there is filed, in the office of the county clerk of the county in which such real property or the greater part thereof lies, a memorandum stating:

The number of the action, if it is numbered, and the style of such action or proceeding and the court in which it is commenced, or is pending;

The name of the person whose right, title, interest in, or claim to, real property is involved or affected; and

A description of the real property in the county thereby affected.

Such notice may be filed by any party in interest. No notice shall extend to the interest of any person not designated therein, nor to any real property or interest except that described therein, and when any amendment is made in the action or proceeding changing the description of the real property, or interest involved or affected, or extending the claim against the property, the party filing such notice shall file a new notice.

Where the real property so affected consists of tracts lying in different counties, a separate notice shall be filed in each county as to the tract lying in that county.

History.

2358a-1: amend. Acts 1944, ch. 21, § 1.

382.450.
Memorandum of attachment or execution to be filed.

No attachment or execution, nor any levy or sale under either, shall in any manner affect the right, title to, or interest of a subsequent purchaser, lessee or encumbrancer without notice thereof of any real estate or any interest therein upon which such attachment or execution is levied, except from the time there is filed, as provided in KRS

382.440

, a memorandum, showing the number and style of the action in which the attachment or execution issued, the court from which it issued, the number, if any, of such attachment or execution, the date thereof, and the name of the persons in whose favor and against whom it issued.

Any of the notices provided for in this section or in KRS

382.440

may be filed by any party in interest.

History.

2358a-2.

382.460.
Notice to be endorsed, recorded and indexed — Fees.

The clerk shall number the notices filed under KRS

382.440

and

382.450

, in the order in which they are received, shall endorse on each notice the day and hour of the receipt and the name of the person filing it and shall record the same in a book to be kept for that purpose. He shall forthwith index the notices mentioned in KRS

382.440

by their numbers and by the name of each person whose interest is therein stated to be affected, and the notices mentioned in KRS

382.450

by their numbers and by the names of each person against whom the attachment or execution is stated to have issued.

For recording each notice mentioned in KRS

382.450

and for the notices mentioned in KRS

382.440

the clerk shall receive a fee pursuant to KRS

64.012

for each tract of land therein separately described. The fees shall be paid in advance, and shall be taxed as part of the costs of the party filing the notices in the action, attachment or execution.

History.

2358a-3: amend. Acts 1978, ch. 84, § 16, effective June 17, 1978.

382.470.
Discharge of notice — Fees.

Any notice mentioned in KRS

382.440

and

382.450

may be discharged and annulled by an entry to that effect on the margin of the record thereof, or at the option of the county clerk, in a marginal entry record kept for the same purpose, signed by the person filing the notice or by his or their attorney of record in the action, or by a writing executed, acknowledged, and recorded in the manner provided for conveyance of land. The clerk shall, at the option of the clerk, either link the discharge and its filing location to its respective referenced instrument in the indexing system for the referenced instrument, or enter a memorandum of such discharge on the margin of such record for which he shall charge a fee pursuant to KRS

64.012

, to be paid in advance. Each entry in the marginal entry record shall be linked to its respective referenced instrument in the indexing system for the referenced instrument.

History.

2358a-4: amend. Acts 1982, ch. 323, § 4, effective July 15, 1982; 2006, ch. 255, § 32, effective January 1, 2007.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Kentucky Law Survey, Catron, Wills, Probate and Real Property Law, 71 Ky. L.J. 333 (1982-83).

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Practice Context for Lis Pendens, § 312.00.

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Release of Lis Pendens, Form 312.03.

382.480.
Filing of federal liens.

Notices of tax liens payable to the United States and certificates discharging such liens shall be filed by the collector of internal revenue, in duplicate, in the office of the county clerk of each county within which the property subject to the lien is located.

When a notice of a federal tax lien is filed, the county clerk shall forthwith enter the same in an alphabetical federal tax lien index, showing on one (1) line the name and residence of the taxpayer named in the notice, the collector’s serial number of such notice, the date and hour of filing, and the amount of tax and penalties. He shall endorse on both the original and duplicate copies of the notice the date and hour of filing and shall mail the duplicate to the collector of internal revenue from whom received. The county clerk shall file and keep all original notices so filed, in numerical order, in a file designated “Federal Tax Lien Notices,” or in the encumbrance book.

Notices of all other liens payable to the United States, including, but not limited to environmental protection liens, and certificates discharging such liens shall be filed, in duplicate, in the office of the county clerk of each county within which the property subject to the lien is located.

When a notice of a federal lien as provided by subsection (3) of this section is filed, the county clerk shall forthwith enter the same in an alphabetical federal lien index, showing on one (1) line the name and residence of the property owner named in the notice, identifying the specific lien holder, the date and hour of filing, and the amount of the lien. He shall indorse on both the original and duplicate copies of the notice the date and hour of filing and shall mail the duplicate to the lien holder from whom received. The county clerk shall file and keep all original notices so filed, in numerical order, in a file designated “Federal Lien Notices,” or in the encumbrance book.

History.

4281t-8, 4281t-9: amend. Acts 1988, ch. 343, § 2, effective July 15, 1988.

382.490.
Discharge of federal liens.

When a certificate of discharge of any tax lien issued by the collector of internal revenue is filed in the office of the county clerk where the original notice of the lien is filed, the county clerk shall enter the certificate, with the date of filing, in the federal tax lien index, on the same line where the notice of the lien so discharged is entered, and shall permanently attach the original certificate of discharge to the original notice of lien. He shall mail the duplicate to the collector of internal revenue from whom received.

When a certificate of discharge of any lien as provided by KRS 382.480(3) is filed, the county clerk shall enter the certificate, with the date of filing, in a federal lien index, on the same line where the notice of the lien so discharged is entered, and shall permanently attach the original certificate of discharge to the original notice of lien. He shall mail the duplicate to the lien holder from whom received.

History.

4281t-10: amend. Acts 1988, ch. 343, § 3, effective July 15, 1988.

382.500.
Clerk’s fees for filing.

The county clerk shall be entitled to receive from the Internal Revenue Service a fee pursuant to KRS

64.012

for each notice of tax lien so filed, and a like fee for each lien discharged.

History.

4281t-12: amend. Acts 1978, ch. 84, § 17, effective June 17, 1978.

382.510.
Lis pendens notices concerning proceedings in bankruptcy.

Any county clerk shall receive for record and record any certified copy of any matter in reference to bankruptcy which any Act of Congress of the United States may provide for as being necessary to be filed in the county wherein lands of a bankrupt are situated in order to be notice of said bankruptcy. Such certified copy shall be recorded in the record of deeds and indexed in the general index of deeds in the name of the bankrupt, as grantor, and in the name of the trustee in bankruptcy or receiver (if any), as grantee. The county clerk shall be entitled to a fee pursuant to KRS

64.012

for recording each such certified copy, to be paid by the person who offers the copy for recording.

History.

Enact. Acts 1944, ch. 21, § 2; 1978, ch. 84, § 18, effective June 17, 1978.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Lis Pendens; Notice of Execution, Form 151.25.

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Practice Context for Lis Pendens, § 312.00.

382.520.
Renewal, extension, interest rate modification, or additional loan under mortgage on real estate — Superiority of lien — Release of lien, when.

In all cases where a loan is secured by a real estate mortgage, the mortgage originally executed and delivered by the borrower to the lender shall secure payment of all renewals, extensions, or interest rate modifications of the loan and the note evidencing it, whether so provided in the mortgage or not.

The mortgage referred to in subsection (1) of this section may secure any additional indebtedness, whether direct, indirect, existing, future, contingent, or otherwise, to the extent expressly authorized by the mortgage, if the mortgage by its terms stipulates the maximum additional indebtedness which may be secured thereby. Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, the mortgage lien authorized by this subsection shall be superior to any liens or encumbrances of any kind created after recordation of such mortgage, even to the extent of sums advanced by a lender with actual or constructive notice of a subsequently created lien, provided, however, any mortgagee upon receipt of a written request of a mortgagor must release of record the lien to secure additional indebtedness as exceeds the balance of such additional indebtedness at the time of the request.

The written request referred to in subsection (2) of this section shall be signed by the mortgagor or his agent or attorney, and shall set forth a description of the real property to which the request relates, the date, parties to, the volume and initial page of the record of the mortgage referred to in subsection (1) of this section, and a description of the nature, amount, and holder of the lien or encumbrance which the mortgagor intends to place upon such real property. The request shall be deemed to have been received by the holder of the mortgage referred to in subsection (1) of this section only when delivered to the holder by certified mail, return receipt requested, at the address of the holder appearing of record on the mortgage or an assignment thereof;

If within ten (10) business days after receipt of the written request referred to in this subsection, the holder of the mortgage referred to in subsection (1) of this section fails to release that amount of the lien to secure additional indebtedness to the extent described in the request, the mortgagor may record in the office of the county clerk in which the mortgage referred to in subsection (1) of this section is recorded a copy of the written request upon payment of the same filing fee as provided for a release of a mortgage;

If, after a copy of the written request is recorded, an advance is made by the holder of the mortgage referred to in subsection (1) of this section, then the lien of the mortgage for the unpaid balance of the advance so made shall be subordinate to the lien or encumbrance described in the request.

History.

Enact. Acts 1948, ch. 196; 1960, ch. 89; 1968, ch. 152, § 158; 1980, ch. 168, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 323, § 6, effective July 15, 1982; 1986, ch. 103, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1992, ch. 49, § 2, effective July 14, 1992; 2014, ch. 31, § 1, effective July 15, 2014; 2015 ch. 48, § 1, effective June 24, 2015.

382.600.
Construction of KRS 382.600 to 382.730. [Repealed.]

382.610.
Personal property that may be mortgaged, rank of mortgage. [Repealed.]

382.620.
Mortgage to secure future advances. [Repealed.]

382.635.
Exception to general rule — Tobacco crops. [Repealed.]

382.640.
Provisions in mortgage to Federal agency for sale or exchange of mortgaged goods. [Repealed.]

382.650.
Execution and acknowledgment. [Repealed.]

382.660.
Affidavit as to consideration not necessary. [Repealed.]

382.670.
Recording of chattel mortgages. [Repealed.]

382.675.
Recording motor vehicle liens. [Repealed.]

382.680.
Assignment or discharge; recording of. [Repealed.]

382.690.
Waiver or subordination; recording of. [Repealed.]

382.700.
Fees for recording. [Repealed.]

382.710.
Removal of mortgaged property from county; release of property from mortgage lien. [Repealed.]

382.720.
Catchline at repeal: Mortgage invalid after three years unless statement filed; exceptions. [Repealed.]

382.730.
Foreclosure by federal agencies. [Repealed.]

382.740.
Filing security interest in motor vehicle. [Repealed.]

382.750.
Filing statement that refers to financing statement. [Repealed.]

382.760.
County clerk’s delivery of statement under commercial code. [Repealed.]

382.770.
Requirement that serial number of property be included in financing statement. [Repealed.]

382.780.
Requirement that financing statement state debt of $200 or more. [Repealed.]

382.790.
Mandatory termination statement. [Repealed.]